public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.aff
PFX f 0 לכשכב [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשכב וו
PFX f 0 לכשכב" .
PFX f 0 לכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשככ [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשככ וו
PFX f 0 לכשככ" .
PFX f 0 לכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשכל [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשכל וו
PFX f 0 לכשכל" .
PFX f 0 לכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשכמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשכמ וו
PFX f 0 לכשכמ" .
PFX f 0 לכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשל [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשל וו
PFX f 0 לכשל" .
PFX f 0 לכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשלכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשלכ וו
PFX f 0 לכשלכ" .
PFX f 0 לכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשמ וו
PFX f 0 לכשמ" .
PFX f 0 לכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשמכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 לכשמכ וו
PFX f 0 לכשמכ" .
PFX f 0 לכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 מ [^ו]
PFX f 0 מ וו
PFX f 0 מ" .
PFX f 0 מו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 מב [^ו]
PFX f 0 מב וו
PFX f 0 מב" .
PFX f 0 מבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 מכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 מכ וו
PFX f 0 מכ" .
PFX f 0 מכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 מל [^ו]
PFX f 0 מל וו
PFX f 0 מל" .
PFX f 0 מלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משב [^ו]
PFX f 0 משב וו
PFX f 0 משב" .
PFX f 0 משבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משבכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משבכ וו
PFX f 0 משבכ" .
PFX f 0 משבכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משכ וו
PFX f 0 משכ" .
PFX f 0 משכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משכב [^ו]
PFX f 0 משכב וו
PFX f 0 משכב" .
PFX f 0 משכבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משככ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משככ וו
PFX f 0 משככ" .
PFX f 0 משככו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משכל [^ו]
PFX f 0 משכל וו
PFX f 0 משכל" .
PFX f 0 משכלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משכמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משכמ וו
PFX f 0 משכמ" .
PFX f 0 משכמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משל [^ו]
PFX f 0 משל וו
PFX f 0 משל" .
PFX f 0 משלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משלכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משלכ וו
PFX f 0 משלכ" .
PFX f 0 משלכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משמ וו
PFX f 0 משמ" .
PFX f 0 משמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 משמכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 משמכ וו
PFX f 0 משמכ" .
PFX f 0 משמכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שב וו
PFX f 0 שב" .
PFX f 0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שבכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שבכ וו
PFX f 0 שבכ" .
PFX f 0 שבכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכ וו
PFX f 0 שכ" .
PFX f 0 שכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכב וו
PFX f 0 שכב" .
PFX f 0 שכבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שככ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שככ וו
PFX f 0 שככ" .
PFX f 0 שככו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכל וו
PFX f 0 שכל" .
PFX f 0 שכלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכמ וו
PFX f 0 שכמ" .
PFX f 0 שכמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשב וו
PFX f 0 שכשב" .
PFX f 0 שכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשבכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשבכ וו
PFX f 0 שכשבכ" .
PFX f 0 שכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכ וו
PFX f 0 שכשכ" .
PFX f 0 שכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכב וו
PFX f 0 שכשכב" .
PFX f 0 שכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשככ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשככ וו
PFX f 0 שכשככ" .
PFX f 0 שכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכל וו
PFX f 0 שכשכל" .
PFX f 0 שכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשכמ וו
PFX f 0 שכשכמ" .
PFX f 0 שכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשל וו
PFX f 0 שכשל" .
PFX f 0 שכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשלכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשלכ וו
PFX f 0 שכשלכ" .
PFX f 0 שכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשמ וו
PFX f 0 שכשמ" .
PFX f 0 שכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשמכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שכשמכ וו
PFX f 0 שכשמכ" .
PFX f 0 שכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 של [^ו]
PFX f 0 של וו
PFX f 0 של" .
PFX f 0 שלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכ וו
PFX f 0 שלכ" .
PFX f 0 שלכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשב וו
PFX f 0 שלכשב" .
PFX f 0 שלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשבכ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשבכ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשכ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכב וו
PFX f 0 שלכשכב" .
PFX f 0 שלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשככ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשככ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשככ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכל וו
PFX f 0 שלכשכל" .
PFX f 0 שלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשכמ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשכמ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשל וו
PFX f 0 שלכשל" .
PFX f 0 שלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשלכ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשלכ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשמ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשמ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שלכשמכ וו
PFX f 0 שלכשמכ" .
PFX f 0 שלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמ וו
PFX f 0 שמ" .
PFX f 0 שמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמכ וו
PFX f 0 שמכ" .
PFX f 0 שמכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשב וו
PFX f 0 שמשב" .
PFX f 0 שמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשבכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשבכ וו
PFX f 0 שמשבכ" .
PFX f 0 שמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכ וו
PFX f 0 שמשכ" .
PFX f 0 שמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכב [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכב וו
PFX f 0 שמשכב" .
PFX f 0 שמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשככ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשככ וו
PFX f 0 שמשככ" .
PFX f 0 שמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכל וו
PFX f 0 שמשכל" .
PFX f 0 שמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשכמ וו
PFX f 0 שמשכמ" .
PFX f 0 שמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשל [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשל וו
PFX f 0 שמשל" .
PFX f 0 שמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשלכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשלכ וו
PFX f 0 שמשלכ" .
PFX f 0 שמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשמ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשמ וו
PFX f 0 שמשמ" .
PFX f 0 שמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשמכ [^ו]
PFX f 0 שמשמכ וו
PFX f 0 שמשמכ" .
PFX f 0 שמשמכו ו[^ו]
