public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.dic
אבדכם/fj
אדות/fj
אחדכם/fj
אלצך/fj
אלצכן/fj
ארות/fj
אששך/fj
אששכן/fj
בדות/fj
בדרכם/fj
בהוק/fj
בזותה/fj
בזותך/fj
בזותכן/fj
בזותן/fj
בזותני/fj
בזרכם/fj
בחול/fj
בטאך/fj
בטאכן/fj
בטחכם/fj
בטלך/fj
בטלכן/fj
בלוע/fj
בנותו/fj
בנותכם/fj
בנותם/fj
בנותנו/fj
בסמך/fj
בסמכן/fj
בססכם/fj
בעור/fj
בערכם/fj
בצעך/fj
בצעכן/fj
בצרכם/fj
בקוע/fj
בקשכם/fj
ברוח/fj
בשלכם/fj
בתרך/fj
בתרכן/fj
גבבכם/fj
גבשך/fj
גבשכן/fj
גדלכם/fj
גהור/fj
גחככם/fj
גלחך/fj
גלחכן/fj
גנוח/fj
געוש/fj
געת/fj
גרדכם/fj
גשת/fj
דאות/fj
דהור/fj
דול/fj
דונכם/fj
דחות/fj
דחותו/fj
דחותכם/fj
דחותם/fj
דחותנו/fj
דכאך/fj
דכאכן/fj
דמוע/fj
דפנך/fj
דפנכן/fj
הבנותו/fj
הבנותכם/fj
הבנותם/fj
הבנותנו/fj
הגותני/fj
הגלותה/fj
הגלותך/fj
הגלותכן/fj
הגלותן/fj
הגלותני/fj
הונות/fj
הזות/fj
הזנותו/fj
הזנותכם/fj
הזנותם/fj
הזנותנו/fj
החוות/fj
החיותה/fj
החיותך/fj
החיותכן/fj
החיותן/fj
החיותני/fj
החנותה/fj
החנותך/fj
החנותכן/fj
החנותן/fj
החנותני/fj
הטותה/fj
הטותך/fj
הטותכן/fj
הטותן/fj
הטותני/fj
הטעותה/fj
הטעותך/fj
הטעותכן/fj
הטעותן/fj
הטעותני/fj
היבנות/fj
היגלות/fj
הידלות/fj
היהנות/fj
היחזות/fj
היכפות/fj
הילוות/fj
היפנות/fj
היצפות/fj
היקנות/fj
הישבות/fj
הכות/fj
הכותו/fj
הכותכם/fj
הכותם/fj
הכותנו/fj
הלאות/fj
הלאותו/fj
הלאותכם/fj
הלאותם/fj
הלאותנו/fj
הלוות/fj
הללכם/fj
הלקות/fj
הלקותו/fj
הלקותכם/fj
הלקותם/fj
הלקותנו/fj
המות/fj
הנחותו/fj
הנחותכם/fj
הנחותם/fj
הנחותנו/fj
הסוות/fj
העוות/fj
העלותה/fj
העלותך/fj
העלותכן/fj
העלותן/fj
העלותני/fj
הפנותה/fj
הפנותך/fj
הפנותכן/fj
הפנותן/fj
הפנותני/fj
הפרותו/fj
הפרותכם/fj
הפרותם/fj
הפרותנו/fj
הקהות/fj
הקהותו/fj
הקהותכם/fj
הקהותם/fj
הקהותנו/fj
הקנות/fj
הקנותו/fj
הקנותכם/fj
הקנותם/fj
הקנותנו/fj
הקצותה/fj
הקצותך/fj
הקצותכן/fj
הקצותן/fj
הקצותני/fj
הקשותו/fj
הקשותכם/fj
הקשותם/fj
הקשותנו/fj
הראות/fj
הראותו/fj
הראותכם/fj
הראותם/fj
הראותנו/fj
הרבות/fj
הרבותו/fj
הרבותכם/fj
הרבותם/fj
הרבותנו/fj
הרוות/fj
הרפות/fj
הרפותו/fj
הרפותכם/fj
הרפותם/fj
הרפותנו/fj
הרשות/fj
השהותה/fj
השהותך/fj
השהותכן/fj
השהותן/fj
השהותני/fj
השעות/fj
השעותו/fj
השעותכם/fj
השעותם/fj
השעותנו/fj
השקותה/fj
השקותך/fj
השקותכן/fj
השקותן/fj
השקותני/fj
השרותו/fj
השרותכם/fj
השרותם/fj
השרותנו/fj
התוות/fj
וודא/fj
ווסתך/fj
ווסתכן/fj
וותר/fj
זהותני/fj
זווגכם/fj
זחול/fj
זקון/fj
זקקכם/fj
זרוח/fj
חבבכם/fj
חדדך/fj
חדדכן/fj
חדשכם/fj
חוותני/fj
חזקכם/fj
חטוא/fj
חכותו/fj
חכותכם/fj
חכותם/fj
חכותנו/fj
חלצך/fj
חלצכן/fj
חממכם/fj
חמשך/fj
חמשכן/fj
חסלכם/fj
חסנך/fj
חסנכן/fj
חפשכם/fj
חקות/fj
חקותו/fj
חקותכם/fj
חקותם/fj
חקותנו/fj
חרפך/fj
חרפכן/fj
חשלכם/fj
חתלך/fj
חתלכן/fj
טהרכם/fj
טמאך/fj
טמאכן/fj
טנפך/fj
טנפכן/fj
טפוח/fj
יגוע/fj
יהנות/fj
יהרג/fj
ייפות/fj
ירוא/fj
ישון/fj
כבותה/fj
כבותך/fj
כבותכן/fj
כבותן/fj
כבותני/fj
כבסכם/fj
כוונך/fj
כוונכן/fj
כנותני/fj
כערך/fj
כערכן/fj
כפותך/fj
כפותכן/fj
כפותן/fj
כפותני/fj
לדת/fj
לדתו/fj
לדתכם/fj
לדתם/fj
לדתנו/fj
לוותו/fj
לוותכם/fj
לוותם/fj
לוותנו/fj
לחוך/fj
לחכך/fj
לחככן/fj
לטפכם/fj
לעוג/fj
לקקכם/fj
מגרך/fj
מגרכן/fj
מחות/fj
מלטכם/fj
ממשך/fj
מנותה/fj
מנותך/fj
מנותכן/fj
מנותן/fj
מנותני/fj
מסותו/fj
מסותכם/fj
מסותם/fj
מסותנו/fj
מעוד/fj
מצותה/fj
מצותך/fj
מצותכן/fj
מצותן/fj
מצותני/fj
מקדכם/fj
מקמך/fj
מקמכן/fj
משותו/fj
משותכן/fj
משותן/fj
משותני/fj
מתנכם/fj
מתנכן/fj
נאוף/fj
נאצך/fj
נאצכם/fj
נאצכן/fj
נדותה/fj
נדותו/fj
נדותך/fj
נדותכן/fj
נדותנו/fj
נדותני/fj
נהות/fj
נהלכם/fj
נהלכן/fj
נחמך/fj
נחמכם/fj
נחמכן/fj
נסוע/fj
נסותה/fj
נסותו/fj
נסותכם/fj
נסותכן/fj
נסותם/fj
נסותנו/fj
נסותני/fj
נסרך/fj
נסרכן/fj
נעום/fj
נעור/fj
נפקכם/fj
נפקכן/fj
נקדך/fj
נקדכן/fj
נקות/fj
נקותה/fj
נקותך/fj
נקותכם/fj
נקותכן/fj
נקותן/fj
נקותנו/fj
נקותני/fj
נקזכם/fj
נקזכן/fj
נשוק/fj
נתצכם/fj
נתצכן/fj
סאון/fj
סובכם/fj
סובכן/fj
סווגך/fj
סווגכן/fj
סחוב/fj
סטות/fj
סכלכם/fj
סכלכן/fj
סכנך/fj
סכנכן/fj
סלוח/fj
סממך/fj
סממכן/fj
סננך/fj
סננכם/fj
סעוד/fj
סעור/fj
ספוח/fj
סרסכם/fj
סרסכן/fj
עדנך/fj
עדנכן/fj
עוותך/fj
עוותכם/fj
עכבך/fj
עכבכם/fj
עכבכן/fj
עכלכם/fj
עכלכן/fj
ענגך/fj
ענגכן/fj
ענותה/fj
ענותו/fj
ענותכם/fj
ענותכן/fj
ענותם/fj
ענותנו/fj
ענותני/fj
עסות/fj
עסותו/fj
עסותך/fj
עסותכם/fj
עסותם/fj
עסותן/fj
עסותנו/fj
עקלך/fj
עקלכם/fj
עקלכן/fj
עקמכם/fj
עקמכן/fj
עשות/fj
עשותו/fj
עשותך/fj
עשותכם/fj
עשותם/fj
עשותן/fj
עשותנו/fj
פדותה/fj
פדותו/fj
פדותך/fj
פדותכן/fj
פדותם/fj
פדותן/fj
פדותני/fj
פוש/fj
פזרך/fj
פזרכן/fj
פחוד/fj
פטמך/fj
פטמכן/fj
פכות/fj
פלות/fj
פנותה/fj
פנותו/fj
פנותך/fj
פנותכן/fj
פנותם/fj
פנותן/fj
פנותני/fj
פנקך/fj
פנקכם/fj
פסוח/fj
פסוע/fj
פעול/fj
פעות/fj
פצוח/fj
פצות/fj
פצותו/fj
פצותך/fj
פצותכם/fj
פצותם/fj
פצותן/fj
פצותנו/fj
פצחך/fj
פצחכם/fj
פצחכן/fj
פצלכם/fj
פצלכן/fj
פרוח/fj
פשות/fj
פשטך/fj
פשטכם/fj
פשקך/fj
פשקכם/fj
פשקכן/fj
פתותה/fj
פתותו/fj
פתותך/fj
פתותכן/fj
פתותם/fj
פתותן/fj
פתותני/fj
צבוא/fj
צהול/fj
צטטך/fj
צטטכם/fj
צטטכן/fj
צלוע/fj
צלות/fj
צלותה/fj
צלותך/fj
צלותכם/fj
צלותכן/fj
צלותן/fj
צלותנו/fj
צלותני/fj
צמוח/fj
צנוח/fj
צעוד/fj
צפותה/fj
צפותו/fj
צפותך/fj
צפותכן/fj
צפותם/fj
צפותן/fj
צפותני/fj
צקת/fj
צרוח/fj
צרפכם/fj
צרפכן/fj
קבצך/fj
קבצכן/fj
קדמך/fj
קדמכם/fj
קדשך/fj
קדשכם/fj
קדשכן/fj
קזזך/fj
קזזכם/fj
קזזכן/fj
קחתה/fj
קחתו/fj
קחתך/fj
קחתכן/fj
קחתם/fj
קחתן/fj
קחתני/fj
קלוח/fj
קללך/fj
קללכן/fj
קנות/fj
קנותה/fj
קנותך/fj
קנותכם/fj
קנותכן/fj
קנותן/fj
קנותנו/fj
קנותני/fj
קנחכם/fj
קנחכן/fj
קפוח/fj
רדות/fj
רהטך/fj
רהטכם/fj
רחוש/fj
רככך/fj
רכככם/fj
רמותה/fj
רמותו/fj
רמותך/fj
רמותכן/fj
רמותם/fj
רמותן/fj
רמותני/fj
רססך/fj
רססכם/fj
רעוב/fj
רעוד/fj
רעוש/fj
רפותה/fj
רפותו/fj
רפותך/fj
רפותכן/fj
רפותם/fj
רפותן/fj
רפותני/fj
רצוח/fj
רצותה/fj
רצותך/fj
רצותכם/fj
רצותכן/fj
רצותן/fj
רצותנו/fj
רצותני/fj
רתוע/fj
רתקך/fj
רתקכם/fj
שאוג/fj
שאתני/fj
שבותה/fj
שבותך/fj
שבותכם/fj
שבותכן/fj
שבותן/fj
שבותנו/fj
שבותני/fj
שגעך/fj
שגעכם/fj
שגעכן/fj
שדככם/fj
שדככן/fj
שדלך/fj
שדלכן/fj
שווקך/fj
שווקכם/fj
שחדך/fj
שחדכם/fj
שחדכן/fj
שימכם/fj
שימכן/fj
שלות/fj
שלותו/fj
שלותך/fj
שלותכם/fj
שלותם/fj
שלותן/fj
שלותנו/fj
שלמך/fj
שלמכם/fj
שלמכן/fj
שמוע/fj
שמחך/fj
שמחכם/fj
שנותה/fj
שנותו/fj
שנותך/fj
שנותכן/fj
שנותם/fj
שנותן/fj
שנותני/fj
שננך/fj
שננכם/fj
שסות/fj
שעוט/fj
שפדך/fj
שפדכן/fj
שפצך/fj
שפצכם/fj
שפרך/fj
שפרכם/fj
שפרכן/fj
שקמכם/fj
שקמכן/fj
שקצך/fj
שקצכן/fj
שתפך/fj
שתפכם/fj
תבלך/fj
תבלכם/fj
תבלכן/fj
תוש/fj
תחמך/fj
תחמכם/fj
תלותני/fj
תנות/fj
תעבך/fj
תעבכן/fj
תעדך/fj
תעדכם/fj
תתה/fj
תתו/fj
תתך/fj
תתם/fj
תתן/fj
